Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.160

Qualification for admission to district's schools—Fees for preadmission screening.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5253-S.SL) ***

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and otherwise provided by law, it is the general policy of the state that the common schools shall be open to the admission of all persons who are five years of age and less than 21 years residing in that school district. Except as otherwise provided by law or rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, districts may establish uniform entry qualifications, including but not limited to birthdate requirements, for admission to kindergarten and first grade programs of the common schools. Such rules may provide for individualized exceptions based upon the ability, or the need, or both, of an individual student. Nothing in this section authorizes school districts, public schools, or the superintendent of public instruction to create state-funded programs based on entry qualification exceptions except as otherwise expressly provided by law.

(2) For the purpose of complying with any rule adopted by the superintendent of public instruction that authorizes a preadmission screening process as a prerequisite to granting individualized exceptions to the uniform entry qualifications, a school district may collect fees to cover expenses incurred in the administration of any preadmission screening process: PROVIDED, That in so establishing such fee or fees, the district shall adopt rules for waiving and reducing such fees in the cases of those persons whose families, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees.

(3) A student who meets the definition of a child of a military family in transition under Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 shall be permitted to continue enrollment at the grade level in the common schools commensurate with the grade level of the student when attending school in the sending state as defined in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010, regardless of age or birthdate requirements.

[ 2023 c 420 s 2; 2009 c 380 s 3; 2006 c 263 s 703; 1999 c 348 s 5; 1986 c 166 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.190. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 261 s 1, part; RRS s 4680, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 64, part; 1890 p 371 s 44, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.190, 28.58.190 part, 28.01.060.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Intent—1999 c 348: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 250: See notes following RCW 28A.150.220.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: See notes following RCW 28A.150.200.

Program of basic education, RCW 28A.225.160 as part of: RCW 28A.150.200.